California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) In developing the framework required pursuant to subdivision (a), the secretary shall consult with appropriate state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Attorney General, the Department of Conservation, the Geologic Energy Management Division, the California Geological Survey, the State Lands Commission, the state board, and the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, as well as industry and legal experts, regarding applicable legal standards. The secretary shall also review other states’ legal standards applicable to carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration projects.

(c) Before publishing the framework pursuant to subdivision (a), the secretary shall provide no less than 90 days for public comment on the framework. The secretary shall consider all comments received during this public comment period in developing the framework.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 359, Sec. 5.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71462.

(a) Title to any geologic storage reservoir is vested in the owner of the overlying surface estate unless it has been severed and separately conveyed.

(b) A conveyance of the surface ownership of real property shall be a conveyance of any geologic storage reservoir below the surface of the real property unless the ownership interest in the geologic storage reservoir previously has been severed from the surface ownership or is explicitly excluded in the conveyance. The ownership of a geologic storage reservoir may be conveyed in the manner provided by law for the transfer of mineral interests in real property. No agreement or instrument conveying a mineral or other interest underlying the surface shall act to convey ownership of a geologic
 storage reservoir unless the agreement explicitly conveys that ownership interest.

(c) (1) An instrument that transfers the rights to a geologic storage reservoir under this section shall include all of the following:

(A) A description of the scope of any right of the owner of the geologic storage reservoir to use the surface estate.

(B) A general description of the potential location of the geologic storage reservoir, including a subsurface geologic or seismic survey or a metes and bounds description of the surface overlying the geologic storage reservoir and any depths or portions of the subsurface that are excluded from the geologic storage reservoir being transferred.

(C) An allocation of legal liability from the overlying
 surface estate owner to the geologic storage reservoir owner consistent with the standards developed in accordance with paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 71461.

(2) The owner of a geologic storage reservoir right shall have no right to use the surface estate beyond that set out in a properly recorded instrument.

(d) Not less than 60 days before commencing development of a carbon dioxide capture, removal, and sequestration project, the carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operator shall provide written notice of the project to each owner of a surface, subsurface, or storage reservoir estate that is adjacent to a geologic storage complex or a geologic storage reservoir that is included in the project.

(e) Each carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operator shall record
 a notation on the deed to the property, or deeds to the properties, where the geologic storage complex or geologic storage reservoir is located, or any other document that is normally examined during a title search, that will notify a potential purchaser of the property, or properties, that the property has, or properties have, been used to sequester carbon dioxide, the volume of carbon dioxide sequestered, the injection zone or zones into which the carbon dioxide was injected, and the dates during which injection occurred.

(f) A carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operator shall be liable for any damages caused by the operation of the carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project.

(g) Nothing in this section shall alter, amend, diminish, or invalidate a right to the use of a geologic storage reservoir that was acquired by contract or lease before
 the effective date of this part.

(h) This section is enacted for the limited purpose of facilitating the development of carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration projects.

(i) (1) This section shall remain operative only until January 1, 2033, or until seven years after the date that the state board adopts regulations pursuant to Section 39741.1. of the Health and Safety Code, whichever is sooner.

(2) This section is repealed on January 1 following the date the section becomes inoperative pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 359, Sec. 5.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

71463.

The State Geologist shall report seismic activity or leakage of carbon dioxide from a carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project to the state board and may recommend changes in the operations of the project to the state board. The state board may require changes in operations of a carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project to ensure public and environmental health and safety, including, but not limited to, a mandatory pause in operation, if the monitoring and reporting detects increased seismicity or carbon dioxide leakage outside of the geologic storage reservoir.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 359, Sec. 5.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71464.

A carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operator shall do all of the following:

(a) Maintain financial responsibility for a period of time that is sufficiently long enough to demonstrate that the risk of carbon dioxide leakage poses no material threat to public health, safety, and the environment and to achievement of net zero greenhouse gas emissions in California and that terminates no earlier than 100 years after the last date of injection of carbon dioxide into a geologic storage reservoir. The operator shall demonstrate financial responsibility by submitting a plan to the state board to cover the short- and long-term costs associated with corrective action, well plugging and abandonment, geologic storage reservoir monitoring, site care and
 site closure, emergency and remedial response, liability associated with seismic activity triggered by the reservoir, or loss of carbon dioxide containment by the geologic storage reservoir, and protection of drinking water quality and public and environmental health and safety through financial responsibility instruments as determined by the state board pursuant to Section 39741.5 of the Health and Safety Code, which may include, but is not limited to, bonds.

(b) Show proof to the state board that there is binding agreement among relevant parties that drilling or extraction that may penetrate the geologic storage reservoir are prohibited to ensure public and environmental health and safety for a period of time that is sufficiently long enough to demonstrate that the risk of carbon dioxide leakage poses no material threat to public health, safety, and the environment and to achievement of net zero greenhouse gas emissions in California and that
 terminates no earlier than 100 years after the last date of injection of carbon dioxide into a geologic storage reservoir.

(c) Create an air monitoring and mitigation plan to measure, track, and minimize potential toxic air contaminants and criteria air pollutants from the site of the carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project and submit the plan to the state board.

(d) Avoid any significant impact on residents in communities affected by a high-cumulative exposure burden caused by a potential net-increase in air, water, and soil pollution emanating from the site of the carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project in accordance with all applicable local, state, and federal laws and requirements, including requirements to use best available control technology, as defined in Section 40405 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Comply with Section 39741.1 of the Health and Safety Code and the regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to that section.

(f) Where avoidance of increased air pollution on site from such a project is not feasible, invest in mitigation in the community location adjacent to where the carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project is located which would be exposed to or impacted by any potential increased air pollution if mitigation measures are required pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) for the project to address significant impacts in local air pollution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 359, Sec. 5.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71465.

(a) (1) An interstate pipeline subject to Part 195 (commencing with Section 195.0) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be used to transport carbon dioxide to or from a carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project only after the federal Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration has concluded the rulemaking (RIN 2137-AF60) regarding minimum federal safety standards for transportation of carbon dioxide by pipeline (Parts 190 to 199, inclusive, of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations) and the carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operator demonstrates that the pipeline meets those standards.

(2) A pipeline, as defined in Section 51010.5 of the Government Code, shall be used to
 transport carbon dioxide to or from a carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project only after the State Fire Marshal adopts regulations pursuant to Section 51011.5 of the Government Code and the carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operator demonstrates that the pipeline meets the standards in those regulations. This section shall not apply to carbon captured at a permitted facility and transported within that facility or property.

(b) The Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, shall, no later than February 1, 2023, provide a proposal to the Legislature to establish a state framework and standards for the design, operation, siting, and maintenance of intrastate pipelines carrying carbon dioxide fluids of varying composition and phase to minimize the risk posed to public and environmental health and safety. The recommended framework shall be designed to minimize risk to
 public health and environmental health and safety, to the extent feasible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 529, Sec. 12.   (SB 614)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 36. MARINE INVASIVE SPECIES ACT [71200. - 71271.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [71200. - 71202.]

71200.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this division:

(a) “Ballast tank” means a tank or hold on a vessel used for carrying ballast water, whether or not the tank or hold was designed for that purpose.

(b) “Ballast water” means water and suspended matter taken on board a vessel to control or maintain trim, draft, stability, or stresses of the vessel, without regard to the manner in which it is carried.

(c) “Biofouling” means the attachment or association of marine organisms to the wetted portion of a vessel or its appurtenances, including,
 but not limited to, sea chests, propellers, anchors, and associated chains.

(d) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(e) “Coastal waters” means estuarine and ocean waters within 200 nautical miles of land or less than 2,000 meters (6,560 feet, 1,093 fathoms) deep, and rivers, lakes, or other water bodies navigably connected to the ocean.

(f) “Commission” means the State Lands Commission.

(g) “EEZ” means exclusive economic zone, which extends from the baseline of the territorial sea of the United States seaward 200 nautical miles.

(h) “Exchange” means to replace the water in a ballast
 tank using either of the following methods:

(1) “Flow through exchange,” which means to flush out ballast water by pumping three full volumes of mid-ocean water through the tank, continuously displacing water from the tank, to minimize the number of original coastal organisms remaining in the tank.

(2) “Empty/refill exchange,” which means to pump out, until the tank is empty or as close to 100 percent empty as is safe to do so, the ballast water taken on in ports, or estuarine or territorial waters, then to refill the tank with mid-ocean waters.

(i) “Land” means the material of the earth, whether soil, rock, or other substances, that sits landward of, or at an elevation higher than, the mean high-tide line of the ocean,
 including any rock outcroppings or islands located offshore.

(j) “Mid-ocean waters” means waters that are more than 200 nautical miles from land and at least 2,000 meters (6,560 feet,
 1,093 fathoms) deep.

(k) “Nonindigenous species” means any species, including, but not limited to, the seeds, eggs, spores, or other biological material capable of reproducing that species, or any other viable biological material that enters an ecosystem beyond its historic range, including any of those organisms transferred from one country into another.

(l) “Pacific Coast Region” means all coastal waters on the Pacific Coast of North America east of 154 degrees W longitude and north of 20 degrees N latitude, inclusive, of the Gulf of California.

(m) “Person” means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, business concern, or corporation, including, but not limited to, a government corporation,
 partnership, limited liability company, or association. “Person” also means a city, county, city and county, district, commission, the state, or a department, agency, or political subdivision of the state, an interstate body, or the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities, to the extent permitted by law.

(n) “Port” means any port or place in which a vessel was, is, or will be anchored or moored, or where a vessel will transfer cargo.

(o) “Sediments” means matter settled out of ballast water within a vessel.

 (p) “Vessel agent” means the party representing the vessel’s owner or operator in port. A vessel agent may also be referred to as agent, marine agent, ship agent, or shipping agent.

(q) “Waters of the state” means surface waters, including saline waters, that are within the boundaries of the state.

(r) “Wetted portion of a vessel” means all parts of a vessel’s hull and structures that are either submerged in water when the vessel is loaded to the deepest permissible legal draft or associated with internal piping structures in contact with water taken onboard.

(s) “Vessel” means a vessel of 300 gross registered tons or more.

(t) “Voyage” means any transit by a vessel destined for a California port from a port outside of the coastal waters of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 7.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Note: Sections 71500 et al. are located in Division 37, which follows Section 71271.)
-------------------------------------------

71201.

(a) This division applies to all vessels, United States and foreign, carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water into the coastal waters of the state after operating outside of the coastal waters of the state, except those vessels described in Section 71202.

(b) This division applies to all ballast water and associated sediments taken on a vessel, and to all biofouling.

(c) This division may be known, and may be cited, as the “Marine Invasive Species Act.”

(d) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The purpose of this division is to move the state
 expeditiously toward elimination of the discharge of nonindigenous species into the waters of the state or into waters that may impact the waters of the state, based on the best available technology economically achievable. This division shall be implemented in accordance with this intent, except as expressly provided by this division.

(2) The federal Vessel Incidental Discharge Act, which was enacted on December 4, 2018, preserves the rights of states to petition the federal government to review any standard of performance, regulation, or policy if new information exists that could result in a change to that standard, regulation, or policy.

(3) Nothing restricts the authority of California to respond to an aquatic invasive species emergency in its waters using California’s police powers.

(4) The Legislature strongly
 and unequivocally objects to any loss of state authority to regulate vessel discharges in California waters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 443, Sec. 2.   (AB 912)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

71201.5.

This division does not authorize the discharge of oil, noxious liquids, or other pollutants, in a manner prohibited by state, federal, or international laws or regulations. Ballast water carried in any tank containing a residue of oil, noxious liquid substances, or any other pollutant shall be discharged in accordance with the applicable requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71201.7.

The commission shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this division, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 491, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71202.

This division does not apply to any of the following vessels:

(a) A vessel of the armed forces, as defined in paragraph (14) of subsection (a) of Section 1322 of Title 33 of the United States Code that is subject to the “Uniform National Discharge Standards for Vessels of the Armed Forces” pursuant to subsection (n) of Section 1322 of Title 33 of the United States Code.

(b) A vessel in innocent passage, which is a foreign vessel merely traversing the territorial sea of the United States and not entering or departing a United States port, or not navigating the internal waters of the United States, and that does not discharge ballast water into the waters of the state, or into waters that may impact waters of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 491, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Ballast Water and Biofouling Management Requirements [71203. - 71210.]

71203.

(a) The master, operator, or person in charge of a vessel is responsible for the safety of the vessel, its crew, and its passengers.

(b) (1) The master, operator, or person in charge of a vessel is not required by this division to conduct a ballast water management practice, including exchange, if the master determines that the practice would threaten the safety of the vessel, its crew, or its passengers because of adverse weather, vessel design limitations, equipment failure, or any other extraordinary conditions.

(2) If a determination described in paragraph (1) is made, the master, operator, or person in charge of the vessel shall do all
 of the following:

(A) Take all feasible measures, based on the best available technologies economically achievable, that do not compromise the safety of the vessel to minimize the discharge of ballast water containing nonindigenous species into the waters of the state, or waters that may impact waters of the state.

(B) Include in the ballast water log for the vessel a description of how conducting a ballast water management practice would have risked the safety of the vessel, its crew, or its passengers consistent with the determination made pursuant to paragraph (1).

(C) Notify the commission of the determination at the earliest practicable time.

(D) Provide a copy of the description included in the ballast water log referenced in subparagraph (B) to
 the commission upon request.

(c) Nothing in this division relieves the master, operator, or person in charge of a vessel of the responsibility for ensuring the safety and stability of the vessel or the safety of the crew and passengers, or any other responsibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 443, Sec. 3.   (AB 912)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

71204.

Subject to Section 71203, the master, owner, operator, or person in charge of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water, that operates in the waters of the state shall do all of the following to minimize the uptake and the release of nonindigenous species:

(a) Discharge only the minimal amount of ballast water essential for vessel operations while in the waters of the state.

(b) Minimize the discharge or uptake of ballast water in areas within, or that may directly affect, marine sanctuaries, marine preserves, marine parks, or coral reefs.

(c) Minimize or avoid uptake of ballast water in all of the following areas and circumstances:

(1) Areas known to have infestations or populations of nonindigenous organisms and pathogens.

(2) Areas near a sewage outfall.

(3) Areas for which the master, owner, operator, or person in charge of a vessel has been informed of the presence of toxic algal blooms.

(4) Areas where tidal flushing is known to be poor or in turbid waters.

(5) In darkness when bottom-dwelling organisms may rise up in the water column.

(6) Areas where sediments have been disturbed, such as near dredging operations or where propellers may have recently stirred up the sediment.

(d) Clean
 the ballast tanks regularly in mid-ocean waters, or under controlled arrangements in port or in drydock, to remove sediments and biofouling organisms and dispose of those organisms and sediments in accordance with local, state, and federal law.

(e) Rinse anchors and anchor chains when retrieving the anchor to remove organisms and sediments at their place of origin.

(f) (1) Remove biofouling organisms from the hull, piping, propellers, sea chests, and other wetted portions of a vessel arriving at a California port or place, on a regular basis, and dispose of removed substances in accordance with local, state, and federal law.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), prior to and until the date that the regulations described in Section 71204.6 are adopted, “regular basis” means any of the following:

(A) No longer than by the date of expiration on the vessel’s full-term Safety Construction Certificate or an extension of that expiration date.

(B) No longer than by the date of expiration of the vessel’s full-term United States Coast Guard Certificate of Inspection or an extension of that expiration date by the United States Coast Guard.

(C) No longer than 60 months since the time of the vessel’s last out-of-water drydocking. The commission may approve a time extension to this period.

(3) Inwater cleaning that is performed on the wetted portions of a vessel while in the waters of the state shall be conducted using best available technologies economically achievable, and designed to minimize the release of coating and biological materials, cleaning agents,
 and byproducts of the cleaning process into the surrounding waters. The cleaning shall be performed in accordance with local, state, and federal law.

(g) Provide access to the commission, upon request, for sampling of biofouling and ballast intake and discharge.

(h) Maintain a ballast water management plan that was prepared specifically for the vessel and that shall, upon request, be made available to the commission for inspection and review. This plan shall be specific to each vessel and shall provide, at a minimum, a description of the ballast water management strategy for the vessel that is sufficiently detailed to allow a master or other appropriate ship’s officer or crew member serving on that vessel to understand and follow the ballast water management strategy.

(i) Train the master, operator, person in charge,
 and those members of the crew who have responsibilities under the vessel’s ballast water management plan, on the application of ballast water and sediment management and treatment procedures, as well as procedures described in this section, in order to minimize other releases of nonindigenous species from vessels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 20.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

71204.3.

(a) The commission shall adopt regulations governing ballast water management practices for vessels arriving at a California port from a port outside of the Pacific Coast Region. The commission shall consider vessel design and voyage duration in developing these regulations. The regulations shall be based on the best available technology economically achievable, and shall be designed to protect the waters of the state. The regulations shall include, as appropriate, restrictions or prohibitions on discharge of ballast water containing nonindigenous species into areas in and outside estuaries and into ocean areas shown to have a capacity to retain organisms.

(b) Subject to Section
 71203, the master, operator, or person in charge of a vessel arriving at a California port from a port outside of the Pacific Coast Region shall comply with these regulations.

(c) Prior to and until the date of implementation of the regulations described in subdivision (a), and subject to Section 71203, the master, operator, or person in charge of a vessel that arrives at a California port from a port outside of the Pacific Coast Region shall employ at least one of the following ballast water management practices:

(1) Exchange the vessel’s ballast water in mid-ocean waters, before entering the coastal waters of the state.

(2) Retain all ballast water on board the vessel.

(3) (A) Discharge the ballast water at the same location
 where the ballast water originated, provided that the master, operator, or person in charge of the vessel can demonstrate that the ballast water to be discharged was not mixed with ballast water taken on in an area other than mid-ocean waters.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “same location” means an area within one nautical mile (6,000 feet) of the berth or within the recognized breakwater of a California port, at which the ballast water to be discharged was loaded.

(4) Use an alternative, environmentally sound method of ballast water management that, before the vessel begins the voyage, has been approved by the commission or the United States Coast Guard as being at least as effective as exchange, using mid-ocean waters, in removing or killing nonindigenous species.

 (5) Discharge the ballast water to a
 reception facility approved by the commission.

(6) Under extraordinary circumstances, perform a ballast water exchange within an area agreed to by the commission in consultation with the United States Coast Guard at or before the time of the request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 644, Sec. 3.   (AB 1312)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71204.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2005, the commission shall adopt regulations governing ballast water management practices for vessels arriving at a California port or place from a port or place within the Pacific Coast Region. The commission shall consider vessel design and voyage duration in developing these regulations. The regulations shall be based on the best available technology economically achievable and shall be designed to protect the waters of the state. The regulations shall include, as appropriate, restrictions or prohibitions on discharge of ballast water containing nonindigenous species into areas in and outside estuaries and into ocean areas shown to have a capacity to retain organisms.

(b) Subject to Section 71203, and commencing no later than July 1, 2005, the master, operator, or person in charge of a vessel arriving at a California port or place from a port or place within the Pacific Coast Region shall comply with these regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 491, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71204.6.

On or before January 1, 2012, the commission, in consultation with the board, the United States Coast Guard, and a technical advisory group consisting of interested persons, including, but not limited to, shipping, port, and environmental conservation representatives, shall develop and adopt regulations governing the management of biofouling on vessels arriving at a California port or place. The commission shall consider vessel design and voyage duration in developing the regulations. The regulations shall be based on the best available technology economically achievable, regularly reviewed and revised as appropriate, and shall be designed to protect the waters of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 443, Sec. 4.   (AB 912)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

71205.

(a) (1) The master, owner, operator, agent, or person in charge of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water, that visits a California port, shall provide the information described in subdivision (c) in electronic or written form to the commission at least 24 hours before the vessel arrives at that California port. If a vessel’s voyage is less than 24 hours in total duration, the vessel shall report the required information prior to departing the port of departure.

(2) The information described in subdivision (c) shall be submitted using a form developed by the United States Coast Guard.

(b) If the information submitted in
 accordance with this section changes, an amended form shall be submitted to the commission upon the vessel’s departure from each port of call in California.

(c) (1) The master, owner, operator, or person in charge of the vessel shall maintain on board the vessel, in written or electronic form, records that include all of the following information:

(A) Vessel information, including all of the following:

(i) Name.

(ii) International Maritime Organization number or official number if the International Maritime Organization number has not been assigned.

(iii) Vessel type.

(iv) Owner or operator.

(v) Gross tonnage.

(vi) Call sign.

(vii) Port of registry.

(B) Voyage information, including the date and port of arrival, vessel agent, last port and country of call, and next port and country of call.

(C) Ballast water information, including the total ballast water capacity, total volume of ballast water on board, total number of ballast water tanks, capacity of each ballast water tank, and total number of ballast water tanks in ballast, using measurements in metric tons (MT) and cubic meters (m3).

(D) Ballast water management information, including all of the following:

(i) The total number of ballast tanks or holds, the contents of which are to be discharged into the waters of the state or to a reception facility.

(ii) If an alternative ballast water management method is used, the number of tanks that were managed using an alternative method, as well as the type of method used.

(iii) Whether the vessel has a ballast water management plan and International Maritime Organization guidelines on board, and whether the ballast water management plan is used.

(iv) Whether the master, operator, or person in charge of the vessel has claimed a safety exemption pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 71203 for the vessel voyage, and the reason for asserting the applicability of that paragraph.

(E) Information on ballast water tanks, the contents of which are to be discharged into the waters of the state or to a reception facility, including all of the following:

(i) The origin of ballast water, including the date and location of intake, volume, and temperature. If a tank has been exchanged, the identity of the loading port of the ballast water that was discharged during the exchange.

(ii) The date, location, volume, method, thoroughness measured by percentage exchanged if exchange is conducted, and sea height at time of exchange if exchange is conducted, of ballast water exchanged or otherwise managed.

(iii) The expected date, location, volume, and salinity of ballast water to be discharged into the waters of the state or a reception
 facility.

(F) Discharge of sediment and, if sediment is to be discharged within the state, the location of the facility where the disposal will take place.

(G) Certification of accurate information, that shall include the printed name, title, and signature of the master, owner, operator, person in charge, or responsible officer attesting to the accuracy of the information provided and certifying compliance with the requirements of this division.

(H) Changes to previously submitted information.

(2) The master, owner, operator, or person in charge of a vessel subject to this subdivision shall retain a signed copy of the information described in this subdivision on board the vessel for two years.

(d) The master, owner, operator, or person in charge of a vessel subject to this division shall retain for two years a separate ballast water log outlining ballast water management activities for each ballast water tank on board the vessel and shall make the separate ballast water log available to the commission for inspection and review.

(e) (1) The master, owner, operator, agent, or person in charge of a vessel subject to this division shall provide the information described in subdivision (f) in electronic or written form to the commission annually upon request of the commission. The master, owner, operator, agent, or person in charge of the vessel shall submit that information within 60 days of receiving a written or electronic request from the commission. For purposes of this paragraph, the reporting shall begin on January 1, 2008, and continue until the date that the regulations described in Section
 71204.6 are adopted.

(2) (A) The information described in subdivision (f) shall be submitted using a form developed by the commission.

(B) The master, owner, operator, or person in charge of a vessel subject to this subdivision shall retain a copy of the form submitted pursuant to this subdivision on board the vessel for two years.

(f) The master, owner, operator, agent, or person in charge of a vessel subject to this division shall maintain, in written or electronic form, records that include the following information:

(1) (A) Date and location of drydocking events.

(B) Whether the vessel in general, and the wetted portion of the vessel, sea
 chests, anchors, and associated chains in particular, were cleaned during a drydocking event.

(2) Date and geographic location of all inwater cleaning of the wetted portion of the vessel.

(3) (A) Date and geographic location of all antifouling paint applications to the vessel.

(B) The manufacturer and brand name of the antifouling paint applied to the vessel.

(4) Any additional information required by the commission by rule or regulation.

(g) (1) The master, owner, operator, agent, or person in charge of a vessel subject to this division that has a ballast water treatment system installed on board shall provide to the commission based on a
 schedule to be developed by the commission, by rule or regulation, in consultation with the advisory panel established in Section 71204.9 and the United States Coast Guard, the following information in electronic or written form:

(A) The manufacturer and product name of the ballast water treatment system on board the vessel.

(B) If applicable, the name and organization that has approved the ballast water treatment system and the approval or certification number of the ballast water treatment system technology.

(C) The number of tanks and the volume of each tank that is managed using the ballast water treatment system and that was discharged in waters of the state.

(D) Any additional information required by the commission by rule or regulation.

(2) The information required by paragraph (1) shall be provided on a form developed by the commission.

(h) The master, owner, operator, agent, or person in charge of a vessel subject to this division that has a ballast water treatment system installed on board shall maintain on board the vessel, in written or electronic form, records, including, but not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) Copies of all reports and forms described in subdivision (g), submitted to the commission.

(2) Material safety data sheets for all chemicals utilized in conjunction with the ballast water treatment system.

(3) System manufacturer’s technical guides, publications, and manuals.

(4) Ballast water treatment system performance information, which may be incorporated into the ballast water log described in subdivision (d), and includes, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(A) The date, time, and location of the starting and stopping of the system for the purpose of treating ballast water.

(B) System malfunctions or unexpected situations, including problem resolution.

(C) Both scheduled and unscheduled maintenance of the system.

(D) All relevant measures of performance recorded during system operation.

(E) Any additional information required by the commission by rule or
 regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 644, Sec. 5.   (AB 1312)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71205.3.

(a) The commission shall adopt regulations that do all of the following:

(1) Require an owner or operator of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water that operates in the waters of the state to implement the ballast water discharge performance standards set forth in Section 151.2030(a) of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or as that regulation may be amended.

(2) Require an owner or operator of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water that operates in the waters of the state to comply with the implementation schedule set forth in Section 151.2035(b) of Title 33 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations, or as that regulation may be amended, except as prescribed in Section 151.2036 of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or as that regulation may be amended.

(3) Require an owner or operator of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water that operates in the waters of the state to implement the interim performance standards for the discharge of ballast water recommended in accordance with Table X-1 of the California State Lands Commission Report on Performance Standards for Ballast Water Discharges in California Waters, as approved by the commission on January 26, 2006, by January 1, 2030.

(4) Require an owner or operator of a vessel carrying, or capable of carrying, ballast water that operates in the waters of the state to meet